Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.381

Park or parking.

"Park or parking" means the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers.

[ 1975 c 62 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 62: See note following RCW 36.75.010.